Colorado, session 2026A, SB193.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. The general assembly finds
and declares that the minimum wage of state employees has been, and
continues to be, a bargainable issue under the "Colorado Partnership for
Quality Jobs and Services Act", part 11 of article 50 of title 24, Colorado
Revised Statutes.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-6-101, amend (4) as
follows:
8-6-101. Legislative declaration - minimum wage of workers -
authority of a local government to enact minimum wage laws - tip
offsets - enforcement - report - severability - definitions.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(4) For purposes of AS USED IN this section, UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(a) (I) "EMPLOYER" MEANS A CORPORATION, A PROPRIETORSHIP, A
PARTNERSHIP, A JOINT VENTURE, A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, A TRUST,
AN ASSOCIATION, A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE, AN INDIVIDUAL,
OR ANY OTHER ENTITY THAT EMPLOYS AN EMPLOYEE.
(II) "EMPLOYER" DOES NOT INCLUDE THE STATE OF COLORADO, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-50-104 (4)(d)(I), TO THE EXTENT THAT A
STATE EMPLOYER HAS A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT AS TO
EMPLOYEE WAGES.
(b) "Local government" means a:
(a) (I) City;
(b) (II) Home rule city;
(c) (III) Town;
(d) (IV) Territorial charter city;
(e) (V) City and county;
(f) (VI) County; or
(g) (VII) Home rule county.
(c) "POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE" MEANS:
(I) A COUNTY, A CITY AND COUNTY, A CITY, A TOWN, A SERVICE
AUTHORITY, A SPECIAL DISTRICT, AND ANY OTHER MUNICIPAL OR
QUASI-MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY; AND
(II) A PUBLIC CORPORATION, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 7-49.5-103 (6);
EXCEPT THAT, FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (4)(c), A PUBLIC
CORPORATION DOES NOT INCLUDE THE STATE OF COLORADO, TO THE EXTENT
THAT A STATE EMPLOYER HAS A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT AS
TO EMPLOYEE WAGES.
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-193

SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-15-501, amend
(1)(c) as follows:
31-15-501. Powers to regulate businesses.
(1) The governing bodies of municipalities have the following
powers to regulate businesses:
(c) To license, regulate, and tax, subject to any law of this state, any
lawful occupation, business place, amusement, or place of amusements and
to fix the amount, terms, and manner of issuing and revoking licenses
issued therefor; except that:
(I) For purposes of the application of any occupational privilege tax,
oil and gas wells and their associated production facilities have not been,
are not, and shall not be considered an occupation or business place subject
to such tax; AND
(II) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-50-104 (4)(d)(I), THE STATE
OF COLORADO IS NOT AN OCCUPATION OR BUSINESS PLACE SUBJECT TO SUCH
TAX.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-37-302, add (4) as
follows:
24-37-302. Responsibilities of the office of state planning and
budgeting - repeal.
(4) (a) FOR THE PURPOSES OF SECTION 24-50-104 (1)(a)(II.5), THE
OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING SHALL SUBMIT TO THE JOINT
BUDGET COMMITTEE, ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 4, 2027, A SUPPLEMENTAL
BUDGET REQUEST CONCERNING COMPENSATION OF STATE EMPLOYEES
DURING THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 31-15-501 (1)(c), as amended in section 3 of this act,
takes effect January 1, 2028.
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-193

SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-193